District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.102

Eligibility requirements.

An applicant for licensure as an interior designer shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Architecture and Interior Design that he or she:

(1)

Has passed the examination required by this subchapter; and

(2)

Meets any other requirements established by the Mayor by rule.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.102.

Prior Codifications